Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-2037
Comprehensive state plan for solid waste management; department; duties; rules and regulations; requirements; approval of state plan.

(1) The department shall keep current the comprehensive state plan for solid waste management developed pursuant to section 81-15,166, including the rules, regulations, and guidelines adopted by the council for facilities in cooperation with local governments and with agencies.

(2) Rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the council shall comply with rules and regulations promulgated by the Environmental Protection Agency pursuant to the Hazardous and Solid Waste Amendments of 1984 to the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act, as amended, 42 U.S.C. 6901 et seq., including the exemptions and deadlines provided for in 40 C.F.R. 258.1.

(3) The department shall apply for approval to the Environmental Protection Agency to attain an approved state program for solid waste management.

Laws 1992, LB 1257, § 37.